Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-633
President; write-in campaign; filing;
application; contents.

Any
person engaged in or pursuing a write-in campaign for the office of President
of the United States shall file with the Secretary of State a notarized affidavit
of his or her intent together with an application containing:

(1) The name of the person
pursuing the write-in campaign;

(2) The written consent of the designated vice-presidential
candidate; and

(3)
The names and addresses of the persons who will represent the applicant as
presidential elector candidates together with the written consent of such
persons to become candidates.

Laws 2013, LB349, § 2.